Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE F. COMMERCE AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 490D. "MADE IN TEXAS" LABELING PROGRAM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 490D.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Office" means the Texas Economic Development and Tourism Office.

(2) "Program" means the "Made in Texas" labeling program established under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. "MADE IN TEXAS" LABELING PROGRAM

Sec. 490D.051. ESTABLISHMENT OF "MADE IN TEXAS" LABELING PROGRAM. (a) The office shall establish and administer a "Made in Texas" labeling program.

(b) In establishing the program, the office by rule shall:

(1) establish criteria for determining whether a person may sell, advertise, or offer for sale in this state a product that uses "Made in Texas" or equivalent phrasing to represent that the product was made in whole or in substantial part in this state; and

(2) design and administer the use of a logo for products to be labeled as "Made in Texas" and adopt an application process for authorizing use of the logo.

(c) The criteria established under Subsection (b)(1) must include a requirement that all or virtually all significant parts and processing of a product originated in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 490D.052. EXEMPT PRODUCTS. This chapter does not apply to or authorize the office to adopt rules governing the labeling of:

(1) wine; or

(2) Texas agricultural products, as defined by Section 12.0175, Agriculture Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.